District of Columbia statutes.
20-513

Powers of surviving copersonal representative.

Unless the will otherwise provides: (a) when the appointment of a copersonal representative is terminated, the remaining copersonal representative or representatives may exercise all powers previously exercised by the copersonal representatives; and (b) when one of two or more persons nominated by the will as copersonal representatives is not appointed by the Court, those appointed may exercise all the powers of the office.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155

Cross References

Estate administration, accountings required, see § 20-724.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-513.